District of Columbia statutes.
22-3226.12

Statute of limitations period.

Claims for damages or compensation under this subchapter shall be filed within 3 years of the time the seller or telephone solicitor initiated the solicitation telephone call.

History

Dec. 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-164, § 126l
as added June 8, 2001, D.C. Law 13-301, § 102, 47 DCR 7039